Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.170

May administer oaths.

The state auditor may administer all oaths required by law in matters pertaining to the duties of his or her office.

[ 1995 c 301 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.09.170. Prior: 1890 p 641 s 23; RRS s 11017; prior: Code 1881 s 2586.]